Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 2. Mandatory Areawide Powers.

Sec. 29.35.150.
Scope of areawide powers.

A borough shall exercise the powers as specified and in the manner specified in AS

29.35.150

—

29.35.180

on an areawide basis.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.160.
Education.

Each borough constitutes a borough school district and establishes, maintains, and operates a system of public schools on an areawide basis as provided in AS

14.14.060

. A military reservation in a borough is not part of the borough school district until the military mission is terminated or until inclusion in the borough school district is approved by the Department of Education and Early Development. However, operation of the military reservation schools by the borough school district may be required by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.14.110

. If the military mission of a military reservation terminates or continued management and control by a regional educational attendance area is disapproved by the Department of Education and Early Development, operation, management, and control of schools on the military reservation transfers to the borough school district in which the military reservation is located.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under a former, similar provision, a newly incorporated borough assumed administrative responsibility for a state-operated school within its boundaries immediately after incorporation. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 23.

Sec. 29.35.170.
Assessment and collection of taxes.

A borough shall assess and collect property, sales, and use taxes that are levied in its boundaries, subject to AS 29.45.

Taxes levied by a city shall be collected by a borough and returned in full to the levying city. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.180.
Land use regulation.

A first or second class borough shall provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation in accordance with AS 29.40.

A home rule borough shall provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)